Hawaii statutes.
§576B-305 Duties and powers of responding
tribunal. (a) When a responding tribunal of this State receives a
petition or comparable pleading from an initiating tribunal or directly
pursuant to section 576B-301(b), it shall cause the petition or pleading to be
filed and notify the petitioner where and when it was filed.

(b) A responding tribunal of this State, to
the extent not prohibited by other law, may do one or more of the following:

(1) Establish or enforce a support order, modify a
child support order, determine the controlling child support order, or
determine parentage of a child;

(2) Order an obligor to comply with a child support
order, specifying the amount and the manner of compliance;

(3) Order income withholding;

(4) Determine the amount of any arrearages, and
specify a method of payment;

(5) Enforce orders by civil or criminal contempt, or
both;

(6) Set aside property for satisfaction of the
support order;

(7) Place liens and order execution on the obligor's
property;

(8) Order an obligor to keep the tribunal informed of
the obligor's current residential address, electronic mail address, telephone
number, employer, address of employment, and telephone number at the place of
employment;

(9) Issue a bench warrant for an obligor who has
failed after proper notice to appear at a hearing ordered by the tribunal and
enter the bench warrant in any local and state computer systems for criminal
warrants;

(10) Order the obligor to seek appropriate employment
by specified methods;

(11) Award reasonable attorney's fees and other fees
and costs; and

(12) Grant any other available remedy.

(c) A responding tribunal of this State shall
include in a support order issued under this chapter, or in the documents
accompanying the order, the calculations on which the support order is based.

(d) A responding tribunal of this State may
not condition the payment of a support order issued under this chapter upon
compliance by a party with provisions for visitation.

(e) If a responding tribunal of this State
issues an order under this chapter, the tribunal shall send a copy of the order
to the petitioner and the respondent and to the initiating tribunal, if any.

(f) If requested to enforce a support order,
arrears, or judgment or modify a support order stated in a foreign currency, a
responding tribunal of this State shall convert the amount stated in the
foreign currency to the equivalent amount in United States dollars under the
applicable official or market exchange rate as publicly reported. [L 1997, c
295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next